Colorado statutes. TITLE 31 Government - Municipal
PART 2
ADMINISTRATION

31-30.5-201. Funds created.

There is created and established in each employer having fire department old hire members, a pension fund to be known as the "firefighters' old hire pension fund".

There is created and established in each employer having police department old hire members, a pension fund to be known as the "police officers' old hire pension fund".

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 858, § 1, effective May 23.

Editor's note:

Provisions of this section were formerly numbered as §§ 31-30-501 and 31-30-601.

31-30.5-202. Board of trustees - firefighters' old hire pension fund.

The general supervision, management, and control of the firefighters' old hire pension fund shall be vested in a board of trustees.

In any municipality having a population of less than one hundred thousand, the board shall consist, except as provided in subsection (6) of this section, of the mayor, the municipal treasurer or finance officer, one other person appointed by the governing body of such municipality, and three active or retired old hire members of the fire department serving the municipality who shall be elected by the active and retired old hire members of the fire department. The terms of office on the board shall be: The mayor of the municipality, during tenure in office; the treasurer or finance officer, during tenure in office; the appointed citizen, to be designated by the governing body of the municipality at time of appointment; the three active or retired old hire members of the fire department, to be elected for terms of three years, but at the initial election to be conducted to elect old hire members of the fire department, one old hire member shall be elected for a three-year term, one old hire member for a two-year term, and one old hire member for a one-year term. Thereafter, such old hire members shall be elected for three-year terms. Said board shall elect from its number a president and secretary. The municipal treasurer or finance officer shall be ex officio treasurer of the board.

In any municipality having a population of at least one hundred thousand, the board shall be composed of the mayor, the manager of safety, the manager of revenue, the chief of the fire department, and the city auditor or such persons performing the duties of the above-named officers, and also two active or retired old hire members of the fire department to be selected as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection (3).

During the month of July in each year, the chief officer of the fire department shall conduct an election by secret ballot, at which election all active and retired old hire members of the fire department shall be eligible to vote, for the purpose of determining membership on the board. In the first election so held, two old hire members shall be elected, the member receiving the highest number of votes being elected for a term of two years and the member receiving the next highest number of votes being elected for a term of one year. Upon election, such members shall be certified as members of the board and shall take office on the August 1 following their election. In subsequent elections, only one old hire member shall be elected for a term of two years, and the member receiving the highest number of votes in each subsequent election shall be certified as a member of the board and shall take office on the August 1 following the member's election. In case any old hire member so elected to the board becomes unable or ineligible to serve on the board by reason of death, disability, or for any other cause, a special board election shall be held to fill the vacancy so created for the remainder of the unexpired term.

The board shall select from their number a president and a secretary, and the manager of revenue, or the person performing the duties thereof, shall be ex officio treasurer of said board and custodian of all funds coming into its hands.

In fire protection districts, except as provided in subsection (6) of this section, the board shall consist of the board of directors of the fire protection district, the treasurer of the board of the fire protection district to be treasurer of the fund, and two active or retired old hire members of the fire department. The trustees shall serve terms of office on the board as follows: The president for the term of office, the treasurer for tenure in office, and two active or retired old hire members for two-year terms of office. Initial election of the old hire members of the fire department shall be conducted to elect one old hire member for two years and one old hire member for one year.

In county improvement districts, the board shall consist of one member of the governing board of the county in which the district is located, the county treasurer or finance officer, three residents of the county obligated to pay real or personal property taxes, and two active or retired old hire members of the fire department. The trustees shall serve terms of office on the board as follows: Members of the governing board, during their tenure in office; the county treasurer, during the treasurer's tenure in office; and the two active or retired old hire members of the fire department for two-year terms of office.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsections (2), (3), and (4) of this section, any municipality or fire protection district, with the concurrence of a majority of the active and retired old hire members voting thereon, may by ordinance or resolution create the board to administer the fund if the number of employer representatives on such board equals the number of member representatives on such board; except that, if fewer than two old hire members are available or willing to serve on such board, the number of employer representatives may exceed the number of member representatives.

In case of any consolidation or merger of any municipality, fire protection district, or county improvement district with one or more municipalities, fire protection districts, or county improvement districts, the former trustees of the various firefighters' pension funds of such consolidated or merged political subdivisions shall, with due regard to equal representation, elect seven persons from their number to serve as trustees of the old hire firefighters' pension fund of said merged or consolidated fund, not more than three of whom shall be old hire members, and the former trustees not so elected to serve shall cease to hold office. The trustees of said consolidated fund shall elect from their number a president, secretary, and treasurer.

The treasurer of the board, in addition to any custodian appointed by the board pursuant to section 31-30.5-204 (4), shall be the custodian of the fund and shall secure and safely keep the same, subject to the control and direction of the board, and shall keep books and accounts concerning said fund in such manner as may be prescribed by the board. The books and accounts shall always be subject to the inspection of the board or any member thereof or any other interested person. The treasurer, upon expiration of the treasurer's term of office, shall surrender and deliver to the treasurer's successor all bonds, securities, and unexpended moneys or other property that came into the treasurer's hands as treasurer of said fund. The treasurer shall be required to supply bond in an amount designated by the board and paid for by the fund.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article added with relocation, p. 858, § 1, effective May 23.

L. 2003:

(2) and (3)(a) amended, p. 826, § 1, effective April 1.

L. 2005:

(2), (3)(b), (4), and (5) amended, p. 134, § 1, effective August 8.

Editor's note:

Provisions of this section were formerly numbered as §§ 31-30-402 (1)(a), (1)(b), (2)(a), (2.5), and (3), 31-30-411, and 31-30-502.

31-30.5-203. Board of trustees - police officers' old hire pension fund.

The general supervision, management, and control of the police officers' old hire pension fund shall be vested in a board of trustees.

In any municipality having a population of less than one hundred thousand, unless it is a home rule city or town that provides for the composition of the board by charter or ordinance, the board shall consist of the mayor, the municipal treasurer, the clerk, and one active old hire member of the police department who shall be elected by the active old hire members of the department; except that, if there are no active old hire members available or willing to serve on such board, such board shall consist of the mayor, the municipal treasurer, and the clerk. Said board shall select from their number a president and a secretary. The municipal treasurer shall be ex officio treasurer of said board and custodian of all funds coming into the treasurer's hands.

In any municipality having a population of at least one hundred thousand, the board shall consist of such persons or officials as may be designated by the charter and ordinances thereof.

The treasurer of the board, in addition to any custodian appointed by the board pursuant to section 31-30.5-204 (4), shall be the custodian of the fund, shall secure and safely keep the same, subject to the control and direction of the board, and shall keep books and accounts concerning said fund in such manner as may be prescribed by the board. The books and accounts shall always be subject to the inspection of the board, any member thereof, or any other interested person. Said treasurer, upon expiration of the treasurer's term of office, shall surrender and deliver to the treasurer's successor all bonds, securities, and unexpended moneys or other property that came into the treasurer's hands as treasurer of the fund. The treasurer shall be required to supply bond in an amount designated by the board and paid for by the fund.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 861, § 1, effective May 23.

Editor's note:

Provisions of this section were formerly numbered as §§ 31-30-304, 31-30-305 (1), and 31-30-612.

31-30.5-204. Powers and duties of the board.

The board shall:

Promulgate all necessary rules, not inconsistent with the provisions of this article, for managing and discharging its duties and for its own government and procedure in so doing and for the preservation and protection of the fund.

Hear and decide all applications for relief, pensions, annuities, retirement, or other benefits under the provisions of this article. Action on such applications shall be final and conclusive; except that, when, in the opinion of the board, justice demands that said action should be reconsidered, the same may be reversed by said board.

Keep and preserve a record of actions taken by the board and of all other matters properly before said board.

Make an annual report to the governing body of the employer of the condition of the fund in August of each year.

The board has power to compel witnesses to attend and testify before it upon all matters connected with the provisions of this article in the same manner as is or may be provided by law. The president of said board or any member thereof may administer oaths to such witnesses.

The board has the power to draw on the fund for the payment of expenses attributable to the administration of the fund, the payment of benefits, and for the purpose of investing all or any part of the fund as permitted by part 5 of this article.

The board may designate one or more financial institutions as custodian of the fund. Such persons shall give surety bonds in such amounts and form and for such purposes as the board requires. All moneys paid or transmitted to the custodian shall be credited to appropriate accounts in the fund and the custodian shall maintain a current inventory of all investments of the fund.

In municipalities that prescribe the composition of the board for the police officers' old hire pension fund by ordinance or charter, the board shall have such additional powers and duties as may be provided by the charter and ordinances of such municipalities.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 862, § 1, effective May 23.

Editor's note:

Provisions of this section were formerly numbered as §§ 31-30-305 (4), 31-30-312 (1) and (2), 31-30-403 (3)(a), 31-30-502 (1)(b), and 31-30-615.

31-30.5-205. Attorneys to advise.

It is the duty of the attorneys for the employer to advise the boards on all matters pertaining to their duties and management of the fund when required to do so. Such attorneys shall represent and defend the boards as their attorneys in all suits or actions at law or in equity that may be brought against them and bring all suits and actions in their behalf that may be required or determined upon by said boards. In the event of a conflict between a board and an employer, the board may obtain legal counsel to represent the board in any such action at the expense of the board.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 863, § 1, effective May 23.

Editor's note:

This section was formerly numbered as § 31-30-414.

31-30.5-206. Warrants drawn.

It is the duty of such officers of the municipality, fire protection district, or county improvement district as are designated by law to draw warrants on the treasurer of said municipality, fire protection district, or county improvement district on orders by the board, to draw warrants thereon, payable to the treasurer of said board for all funds belonging to the fund.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 864, § 1, effective May 23.

Editor's note:

This section was formerly numbered as § 31-30-410 (1).

31-30.5-207. Method of payment.

All moneys ordered to be paid from the fund to any person shall be paid by the treasurer only upon the warrant signed by the president of said board and countersigned by the secretary thereof. No warrant shall be drawn except by order of the board after having been duly entered on the records of the proceedings of the board.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 864, § 1, effective May 23.

Editor's note:

This section was formerly numbered as § 31-30-410 (2).

31-30.5-208. Fund not subject to levy.

Except for assignments for child support purposes as provided for in sections 14-10-118 (1) and 14-14-107, C.R.S., as they existed prior to July 1, 1996, for income assignments for child support purposes pursuant to section 14-14-111.5, C.R.S., for writs of garnishment that are the result of a judgment taken for arrearages for child support or for child support debt, for payments made in compliance with a properly executed court order approving a written agreement entered into pursuant to section 14-10-113 (6), C.R.S., and for restitution that is required to be paid for the theft, embezzlement, misappropriation, or wrongful conversion of public property or in the event of a judgment for a willful and intentional violation of fiduciary duties pursuant to this article where the offender or a related party received direct financial gain, no portion of the fund, before or after its order for distribution by the board to the persons entitled thereto, shall be held, seized, taken, subjected to, detained, or levied on by virtue of any attachment, execution, injunction, writ, interlocutory or other order or decree, or process or proceeding whatsoever issued out of or by any court of this state for the payment or satisfaction, in whole or in part, of any debt, damage, claim, demand, or judgment against the employer or the beneficiary of the fund. Said fund shall be held and distributed for the purposes of this article and for no other purpose whatsoever.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 864, § 1, effective May 23; entire section amended, p. 627, § 45, effective July 1; entire section amended, p. 1464, § 13, effective January 1, 1997.

L. 2005:

Entire section amended, p. 75, § 12, effective August 8.

31-30.5-209. Idle funds.

If the governing body of a municipality, by resolution, finds that no person named in this article is, and no such person can become, eligible for payment of a benefit from the municipality's police officers' old hire pension fund established pursuant to section 31-30.5-201 (2), it may authorize use of the money in the fund to make contributions to the defined benefit system trust fund pursuant to section 31-31-402 (2), to make contributions to a police benefit fund established pursuant to section 31-31-601 (1)(b), or to make contributions under the federal social security laws if the municipality's police officers are covered by the social security laws. To the extent that money in the fund exceeds three times the present yearly employer contribution to any of the preceding benefit funds on behalf of the municipality's current police officers, such excess may be used for any law-enforcement-related purpose. If the municipality does not employ any police officer, the governing body may authorize use of the money in the fund for any law-enforcement-related purpose. In addition, any money in the fund that is attributable to contributions by the municipality and to interest on such contributions may be used for any police-related purpose and, if no such police-related need exists, then for any purpose as decided by the governing body of the municipality. For the purposes of this subsection (1), contracting with the county or county sheriff for law enforcement service shall not be considered employment of a police officer.

If the governing body of a municipality, fire protection district, or county improvement district, by resolution, finds that no person named in this article is, and no such person can become, eligible for payment of a benefit from the employer's firefighters' old hire pension fund, it may authorize use of the money in the fund to make contributions to the defined benefit system trust fund pursuant to section 31-31-402 (2) or to make contributions under the federal social security laws if the employer's firefighters are covered by the social security laws. In addition, any money in the fund that is attributable to contributions by the municipality or district and to interest on such contributions may be used for any fire-related purpose and, if no such fire-related need exists, for any purpose as decided by the governing body of the municipality or district.

At least sixty days before adoption of a resolution permitted by subsection (1) or (2) of this section, the governing body of the municipality or district shall publish one notice in a newspaper having general circulation within the municipality or district and shall provide a copy of such published notice to the board of directors of the state fire and police pension association established pursuant to section 31-31-201 (1). The notice shall state the intent of the governing body to use the money in the fund for the purposes permitted in this section. The notice shall state that persons who believe they are or may be entitled to benefit payments from the fund shall have fifty days from the date of the notice in which to file an objection, in writing, with the governing body regarding its proposed use of the fund. If any such written objection is received, the governing body shall hold a public hearing before adoption of any resolution under this section with prior published notice of the time and place of the hearing as well as written notice of such hearing mailed, by certified mail, to each person filing a written objection.

If, within one year after adoption of a resolution pursuant to this section, any person establishes a claim to a benefit from the fund, the municipality or district shall repay to the fund any money expended from such fund pursuant to this section, and no such additional expenditures shall be made from the fund.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsections (1) and (2) of this section and subject to the provisions of paragraph (c) of this subsection (4), if no members are active participants in an employer's old hire pension plan established under this article, the governing body of the employer, by resolution, may authorize the use of the excess balance in the plan fund for the purposes permitted in subsections (1) and (2) of this section. If a governing body authorizes the use of the excess balance under this subsection (4), the employer shall maintain the plan fund at a level equal to at least two times the amount necessary to fund the benefit liabilities of any persons continuing to receive benefits from the plan fund.
(4) (a) (I) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsections (1) and (2) of this section and subject to the provisions of paragraph (c) of this subsection (4), if no members are active participants in an employer's old hire pension plan established under this article, the governing body of the employer, by resolution, may authorize the use of the excess balance in the plan fund for the purposes permitted in subsections (1) and (2) of this section. If a governing body authorizes the use of the excess balance under this subsection (4), the employer shall maintain the plan fund at a level equal to at least two times the amount necessary to fund the benefit liabilities of any persons continuing to receive benefits from the plan fund.

For purposes of this paragraph (a), "excess balance" means the amount in an old hire plan fund in excess of two times the amount necessary to fund the benefit liabilities of persons continuing to receive benefits from the plan fund, as determined by the plan's actuary. In determining the excess balance in an old hire plan fund, the actuary shall utilize the assumptions approved by the board of directors of the fire and police pension association pursuant to section 31-30.5-306 (2)(b).

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsections (1) and (2) of this section and paragraph (a) of this subsection (4) and subject to the provisions of paragraph (c) of this subsection (4), if no members are active participants in an employer's old hire pension plan established under this article and the plan provides no rank escalation benefit to persons receiving benefits from the plan fund, the board, after disclosure to the affected retirees, is authorized to use the assets in the plan fund for the purpose of purchasing annuities in amounts sufficient to pay any required benefits, including nondiscretionary cost-of-living adjustments required under the plan, to those persons who continue to receive benefits from the plan fund. If the board purchases annuities for such persons, the governing body of the employer, by resolution, may authorize the use of any additional funds that remain in the plan fund after purchasing such annuities for the purposes permitted in subsections (1) and (2) of this section. Annuities may be purchased pursuant to this paragraph (b) only from insurance companies rated at least A+ by the A.M. Best company or rated at least AA by Standard & Poors Corporation. If there is a default on the payment of benefits resulting from an annuity purchased under this paragraph (b), the employer remains liable to make any required benefit payments to persons for whom the annuities were purchased.

Moneys in the plan fund in excess of the amount required to purchase annuities as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection (4), if any, may be used to purchase additional benefits or may be treated as an excess balance as provided in paragraph (a) of this subsection (4).

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 864, § 1, effective May 23.

L. 97:

(4) added, p. 21, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

(4)(c) amended, p. 173, § 1, effective October 1.

L. 2006:

(1) and (2) amended, p. 180, § 3, effective March 31.

L. 2008:

(4)(c) amended, p. 14, § 2, effective August 5.

L. 2014:

(4) amended, (SB 14-031), ch. 52, p. 235, § 1, effective March 20.

Editor's note:

Provisions of this section were formerly numbered as § 31-30-313 (2)(a) and § 31-30-412 (2)(a) to (2)(c).

31-30.5-210. Plan amendment.

No modification of any provision of an old hire pension plan established pursuant to this article may be made after December 1, 1978, except as may be authorized by subsection (2) of this section.

Upon the request of an employer and with the approval of sixty-five percent of the active and retired old hire members, the board of directors of the fire and police pension association established pursuant to section 31-31-201 (1), shall permit the modification of any provision of an old hire pension plan established pursuant to this article, if the board determines that such modification will maintain or enhance the actuarial soundness, as defined in section 31-31-102 (1), of such fund. In addition, upon the request of an employer, the board shall permit the modification of any provision of an old hire pension plan necessary to comply with state or federal law. Such modification may be made without the approval of the active and retired old hire members. This subsection (2) shall not be construed to authorize the board to allow a modification of any such old hire plan so as to change the nature of the plan from a defined benefit plan to a money purchase plan or to adversely affect the pension benefits of active or retired old hire members.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 865, § 1, effective May 23.

L. 2003:

(2) amended, p. 827, § 2, effective April 1.

L. 2005:

(2) amended, p. 135, § 2, effective August 8.

Editor's note:

Provisions of this section were formerly numbered as §§ 31-30-805 (10)(a) and 31-30-1005 (6).

31-30.5-211. Affiliation with the fire and police pension association.

Any employer may elect affiliation with the fire and police pension association established by section 31-31-201 (1), relating to an old hire pension plan established pursuant to this article. The procedures for affiliation and other provisions governing the administration of an affiliated plan are set forth in section 31-31-701.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 866, § 1, effective May 23.

Editor's note:

This section was formerly numbered as § 31-30-1003 (3)(a).

31-30.5-212. Qualification requirements - internal revenue code - definitions.

As used in this section, "internal revenue code" means the federal "Internal Revenue Code of 1986", as amended.

Old hire pension plans shall satisfy the qualification requirements specified in section 401 of the internal revenue code, as applicable to governmental plans.

A board, as defined in section 31-30.5-102 (1.5), may adopt any provision for an old hire pension plan that is necessary to comply with the internal revenue code.

The board of directors of the fire and police pension association established by section 31-31-201 may create a master plan document for old hire pension plans and may submit the master plan document to the internal revenue service for a determination of its status as a qualified plan under the internal revenue code. The master plan document shall include provisions necessary to comply with the internal revenue code.

The board of directors of the fire and police pension association established by section 31-31-201 may:

Amend the master plan document as may be necessary to comply with the internal revenue code; and

Require an affiliated board to adopt the master plan document or to obtain internal revenue service approval for its old hire pension plan.

Nothing in this subsection (4) shall preclude an affiliated board from submitting its plan document to the internal revenue service for a determination of its plan document's status as a qualified plan under the internal revenue code.

The old hire pension funds established by this article shall be held in trust for the benefit of old hire members and other persons entitled to benefits. No part of the corpus or income of a pension fund shall be used for or diverted to purposes other than for the exclusive benefit of old hire members or other persons entitled to benefits from the pension fund and for expenses incident to operation of the pension fund. No person shall have any interest in or right to any part of the corpus or earnings of the pension trust except as expressly provided, including assignments for child support purposes as provided for in section 14-14-104, C.R.S., child support arrearages as requested as part of an enforcement action under article 5 of title 14, C.R.S., or child support arrearages that are the subject of enforcement services provided under section 26-13-106, C.R.S., income assignments for child support purposes pursuant to section 14-14-111.5, C.R.S., writs of garnishment that are the result of a judgment taken for arrearages for child support or for child support debt, and payments made in compliance with a properly executed court order approving a written agreement entered into pursuant to section 14-10-113 (6), C.R.S.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 866, § 1, effective May 23.

L. 98:

(8) amended and (9) and (10) added, p. 24, § 2, effective March 16.

L. 2006:

(2) amended, p. 180, § 4, effective March 31.

L. 2009:

Entire section R&RE, (HB 09-1030), ch. 16, p. 89, § 3, effective August 5.

Editor's note:

This section was formerly numbered as § 31-30-324.5.

31-30.5-213. Dissolution of fire departments.

In the event of dissolution, for any reason, of fire departments whereby the services of firefighters or fire departments are discontinued, the firefighters or their surviving spouses, dependent parents, and children receiving benefits at the time of such dissolution shall continue to receive such benefits in accordance with the provisions of this article. Assets of the pension funds shall be transferred with other assets of the department and shall be administered by the board of trustees of the successor pension fund. In no event shall the rate of compensation be altered either after commencement of proceedings for dissolution has occurred or after its completion. After attaining fifty years of age, any firefighter having accrued ten or more years of active service at the time of such dissolution shall be granted an annuity, prorated in accordance with the number of years of service and the amount of annuity being paid for age and service pensions by the board of trustees of such pension fund at the time of such dissolution.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 867, § 1, effective May 23.

Editor's note:

This section was formerly numbered as § 31-30-415 (9).